Hawaii statutes.
[§329-128] Fraudulent misrepresentation;
penalty. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, fraudulent
misrepresentation to a law enforcement official of any fact or circumstance
relating to the medical use of marijuana to avoid arrest or prosecution under
this part or chapter 712 shall be a petty misdemeanor and subject to a fine of
$500.

(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
fraudulent misrepresentation to a law enforcement official of any fact or
circumstance relating to the issuance of a written certificate by a physician
not covered under section 329-126 for the medical use of marijuana shall be a
misdemeanor. This penalty shall be in addition to any other penalties that may
apply for the non-medical use of marijuana. Nothing in this section is
intended to preclude the conviction of any person under section 710-1060 or for
any other offense under part V of chapter 710. [L 2000, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next